Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.540

Financial institution service providers—Examination and information sharing agreements.

The director may enter into examination and information sharing agreements with any state or federal agency that has joint or concurrent jurisdiction over a service provider.

[ 2022 c 49 s 5.]